Nebraska, session 109, LB1233.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1233 LB1233
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Developmental Disabilities Provider Excessive Training and
Cost Reduction Act.
Sec. 2. The purpose of the Developmental Disabilities Provider
Excessive Training and Cost Reduction Act is to prohibit the department
from imposing unnecessarily costly training requirements on employees of
providers and to ensure that training requirements imposed by the
department are focused solely on ensuring the health, safety, and welfare
of the individuals served by providers. The Developmental Disabilities
Provider Excessive Training and Cost Reduction Act further ensures that
such training requirements are appropriate, competitively priced, and
meet all federal requirements for the provision of developmental
disabilities services.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Developmental Disabilities Provider
Excessive Training and Cost Reduction Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) Employee means an individual employed by a provider, including
full-time, part-time, temporary, and contract staff; and
(3) Provider means an individual, organization, or entity licensed
or certified by the state to provide services to individuals with
developmental disabilities.
Sec. 4. (1) The department shall not require, by rule, regulation,
or other guidance or directive, that:
(a) An employee of a provider complete training in the use of a
physical restraint unless such employee's job duties may reasonably
require the employee to physically restrain an individual with
developmental disabilities during the course of employment; and
(b) Physical restraint training, or related requirements for an
employee of a provider, exceed the minimum requirements necessary to
comply with applicable federal law or regulations.
(2) If the department requires physical restraint training, by rule,
-2-

LB1233 LB1233
2026 2026
regulation, or other guidance or directive, for an employee of a
provider, the department shall offer at least two separate options for
fulfilling such training requirements to ensure that training options are
cost competitive. At least one such option shall permit a provider to
utilize an in-house training program if the program meets the safety and
content standards established by federal law and regulations.
Sec. 5. The Developmental Disabilities Provider Excessive Training
and Cost Reduction Act shall apply to all training requirements for
employees of providers whether currently in place or issued, renewed, or
enforced by the department on or after the effective date of this act.
-3-